Utah statutes.
34-46-102.   Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

(1)  "Applicant" means an individual that provides information to an employer for the purpose of obtaining employment.

(2)  "Division" means the Labor Commission's Division of Antidiscrimination and Labor.

(3)  "Employer" means a person employing 15 or more employees within the state for each working day in each of 20 calendar weeks or more in the current or preceding calendar year.

(4)  "Employment selection process" means the process by which an employer selects an individual to be an employee for the employer.

(5)  "Initial selection process" means the receipt of information in a record from an applicant that the employer uses to determine whether the applicant will be considered for a second review for the position for which the applicant is applying.

(6)  "Record" means information that is:

(a)  inscribed on a tangible medium; or

(b) (i)  received or stored in an electronic or other medium; and

(ii)  retrievable in perceivable form.

